apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="র/াখ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেনা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখো</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখোনা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখিস</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখিসনে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেন</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেননা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেনা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেন</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেননা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেনা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখব</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবনা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেনা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবি</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবিনা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেন</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেননা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেনা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেন</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখবেননা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখা</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখতে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখার</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখেছিল</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখেনি</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখেছিলাম</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখিনি</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখেছিলে</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখনি</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখেছিলি</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখিসনি</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখেছিলেন</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াখেননি</l>
          <r>াখ<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েখেছিল</l>

    <e lm="রাখ"><i>র</i><par n="র/াখ__vblex"/></e>
